en: Garters
xx: Garters
cs: Podvazky
da: Strømpebånd
de: Strumpfbänder
es: Ligas
fr: Jarretelles
it: Giarrettiere
ja: ガーター
nl: Jarretels
no: Strømpebånd
pl: Podwiązki
pt: Cintas-ligas
ru: Подвязки
sv: Strumpeband
tr: Jartiyerler

en: Long Johns
xx: Long Johns
cs: Podvlékačky
da: Lange underbukser
de: Lange Unterhosen
es: Ropa interior térmica
fr: Caleçons longs
it: Calzamaglie intime uomo
ja: ももひき
nl: Lange onderbroek
no: Lange underbukser
pl: Kalesony
pt: Ceroulas
ru: Теплые кальсоны
sv: Långkalsonger
tr: Uzun Paçalı Donlar

en: Petticoats & Pettipants
xx: Petticoats & Pettipants
cs: Spodničky a kalhotové spodničky
da: Underskørter og underkjoler
de: Petticoats & Rüschenhöschen
es: Enaguas y pololos
fr: Jupons et jupons-culottes
it: Sottogonne e sottopantaloni
ja: ペチコート
nl: Petticoats en pettipants
no: Petticoats og pettipants
pl: Halki i reformy
pt: Anáguas
ru: Нижние юбки и шортики
sv: Underkjolar och underbyxor
tr: İç Etekler ve Elbise Altına Giyilen Slipler

en: Shapewear
xx: Shapewear
cs: Tvarovací prádlo
da: Shapewear
de: Shapewear
es: Fajas reductoras
fr: Sous-vêtements gainants
it: Indumenti modellanti
ja: 補正下着
nl: Corrigerende kleding
no: Form-undertøy
pl: Bielizna modelująca
pt: Cinta modeladora
ru: Моделирующее белье
sv: Formgivande plagg
tr: Şekillendirici Kıyafetler

en: Socks
xx: Socks
cs: Ponožky
da: Sokker
de: Socken
es: Calcetines
fr: Chaussettes
it: Calze
ja: 靴下
nl: Sokken
no: Sokker
pl: Skarpety
pt: Meias
ru: Носки
sv: Strumpor
tr: Çoraplar

en: Undershirts
xx: Undershirts
cs: Spodní trička
da: Undertrøjer
de: Unterhemden
es: Camisetas interiores
fr: Tricots de corps
it: Magliette intime
ja: アンダーシャツ
nl: Ondershirts
no: Undertrøyer
pl: Podkoszulki
pt: Camisetas interiores
ru: Нижние рубашки
sv: Undertröjor
tr: Fanilalar

en: Underwear
xx: Underwear
cs: Spodní prádlo
da: Undertøj
de: Unterwäsche
es: Calzoncillos
fr: Sous-vêtements, Sous-vêtement
it: Intimo
ja: パンツ・ショーツ
nl: Ondergoed
no: Undertøy
pl: Bielizna
pt: Roupas íntimas
ru: Нижнее белье
sv: Underkläder
tr: İç Giyim

en: Boxer Briefs
xx: Boxer Briefs
fr: Boxers, Boxer

en: Boxer Shorts
xx: Boxer Shorts
fr: Caleçons, Caleçon

en: Briefs
xx: Briefs
fr: Slips, Slip

en: Panties
xx: Panties
fr: Culottes, Culotte

en: Underwear Slips
xx: Underwear Slips
cs: Kombiné
da: Underkjoler
de: Unterhosen
es: Braguitas
fr: Fonds de robe et jupons
it: Slip intimo
ja: スリップ
nl: Slips
no: Undertøy-slip
pl: Slipki
pt: Babydolls
ru: Трусы-слипы
sv: Underklänningar
tr: Külotlar

en: Uniforms
xx: Uniforms
cs: Uniformy
da: Uniformer
de: Uniformen
es: Uniformes
fr: Tenues
it: Uniformi
ja: ユニフォーム
nl: Uniformen
no: Uniformer
pl: Uniformy
pt: Uniformes
ru: Униформа
sv: Uniformer
tr: Üniformalar

en: Contractor Pants & Coveralls
xx: Contractor Pants & Coveralls
cs: Pracovní kalhoty a kombinézy
da: Arbejdsbukser og kedeldragter
de: Arbeitshosen
es: Monos y pantalones de trabajo
fr: Pantalons et combinaisons de travail
it: Tute e pantaloni da lavoro
ja: 作業服ズボン・カバーオール
nl: Broeken en overalls voor de bouw
no: Arbeidsbukser og kjeledresser
pl: Spodnie robocze i kombinezony robocze
pt: Calças e macacões de trabalho
ru: Форменные брюки и комбинезоны
sv: Blåkläder och blåställ
tr: Tulumlar ve İş Elbiseleri

en: Flight Suits
xx: Flight Suits
cs: Letecké kombinézy
da: Pilotdragter
de: Fliegeruniformen
es: Monos de vuelo
fr: Combinaisons de vol
it: Tute da volo
ja: フライトスーツ
nl: Vliegtuigoverall
no: Pilotdresser
pl: Kombinezony pilotów
pt: Uniformes de voo
ru: Летные комбинезоны
sv: Pilotkläder
tr: Havacı Elbiseleri

en: Food Service Uniforms
xx: Food Service Uniforms
cs: Oděvy pro gastronomii
da: Køkkenuniformer
de: Uniformen für das Restaurantgewerbe
es: Uniformes de servicio de comida
fr: Vêtements de cuisine
it: Divise per operatori alimentari
ja: 飲食店制服
nl: Cateringuniformen
no: Servitøruniformer
pl: Odzież gastronomiczna
pt: Uniformes para serviço de alimentação
ru: Униформа для работников общественного питания
sv: Uniformer för livsmedelsservice
tr: Yiyecek Servis Üniformaları

en: Chef's Hats
xx: Chef's Hats
cs: Kuchařské čepice
da: Kokkehuer
de: Kochmützen
es: Gorros de chef
fr: Toques de cuisinier
it: Cappelli da cuoco
ja: コック帽
nl: Koksmutsen
no: Kokkeluer
pl: Czapki szefa kuchni
pt: Chapéus para chef
ru: Поварские колпаки
sv: Kockhattar
tr: Aşçı Şapkaları

en: Chef's Jackets
xx: Chef's Jackets
cs: Kuchařské rondony
da: Kokkejakker
de: Kochjacken
es: Chaquetas de chef
fr: Vestes de cuisinier
it: Giacche da cuoco
ja: コックコート
nl: Koksbuizen
no: Kokkejakker
pl: Kurtki szefa kuchni
pt: Jaquetas para chef
ru: Жакеты для поваров
sv: Kockrockar
tr: Aşçı Önlükleri

en: Chef's Pants
xx: Chef's Pants
cs: Kuchařské kalhoty
da: Kokkebukser
de: Kochhosen
es: Pantalones de chef
fr: Pantalons de cuisinier
it: Pantaloni da cuoco
ja: コックパンツ
nl: Koksbroeken
no: Kokkebukser
pl: Spodnie szefa kuchni
pt: Calças para chef
ru: Поварские штаны
sv: Kockbyxor
tr: Aşçı Pantolonları

en: Military Uniforms
xx: Military Uniforms
cs: Vojenské uniformy
da: Militæruniformer
de: Militäruniformen
es: Uniformes militares
fr: Uniformes militaires
it: Uniformi militari
ja: 軍服
nl: Militaire uniformen
no: Militære uniformer
pl: Mundury wojskowe
pt: Uniformes militares
ru: Военная форма
sv: Militäruniformer
tr: Askeri Üniformalar